Georgia, session 2025_26, SB374.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Part 1 of Article 1 of Chapter 2 of Title 8 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating
to general provisions regarding buildings generally, is amended by revising Code Section
8-2-4, relating to certain residential fire sprinkler requirements prohibited, as follows:
"8-2-4.
Neither the state residential and fire building code nor any residential and fire building
code adopted by a political subdivision of the state adopted after May 24, 2010, shall
include a requirement that fire sprinklers be installed in a single-family dwelling or a
residential building that contains no more than two dwelling units. This Code section shall
not preclude any political subdivision of the state from adopting an ordinance requiring fire
sprinklers to be installed in residential buildings that contain more than two dwelling units."
S. B. 374
- 1 -

LC 44 3143
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
S. B. 374
- 2 -